District of Columbia statutes.
9-319

Cedar Street Subway.

No street railway company shall use the subway herein authorized (to carry Cedar Street under the tracks of the Baltimore and Ohio Railroad Company) for its tracks until such company shall have paid to the Treasurer of the United States a sum equal to one-fourth of the total cost of said subway and bridge, to the credit of the General Fund of the District of Columbia.

May 18, 1910, 36 Stat. 388, ch. 248
Feb. 22, 1921, 41 Stat. 1144, ch. 70, § 7
June 28, 1944, 58 Stat. 533, ch. 300, § 18

History

1981 Ed., § 7-519.
1973 Ed., § 7-519.

Prior Codifications